District of Columbia statutes.
9-925

Constitutional construction.

The provisions of this chapter are severable and if any of its provisions are held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of that court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions of this chapter. It is declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been adopted had any unconstitutional provisions not been included.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 26, 32 DCR 6093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1275.